Nebraska, session 109, LB495.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB495 LB495
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-1632, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1632 (1) If the annual assessment of property would result in an
increase in the total property taxes levied by a county, city, village,
school district, learning community, sanitary and improvement district,
natural resources district, educational service unit, or community
college, as determined using the previous year's rate of levy, such
political subdivision's property tax request for the current year shall
be no more than its property tax request in the prior year, and the
political subdivision's rate of levy for the current year shall be
decreased accordingly when such rate is set by the county board of
equalization pursuant to section 77-1601. The governing body of the
political subdivision shall pass a resolution or ordinance to set the
amount of its property tax request after holding the public hearing
required in subsection (3) of this section. If the governing body of a
political subdivision seeks to set its property tax request at an amount
that exceeds its property tax request in the prior year, it may do so,
subject to the limitations provided in the School District Property Tax
Limitation Act and the Property Tax Growth Limitation Act, after holding
the public hearing required in subsection (3) of this section and by
passing a resolution or ordinance that complies with subsection (4) of
this section. If any county, city, or school district , or community
college seeks to increase its property tax request by more than the
allowable growth percentage, such political subdivision shall comply with
the requirements of section 77-1633 in lieu of the requirements in
subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(2) If the annual assessment of property would result in no change
or a decrease in the total property taxes levied by a county, city,
village, school district, learning community, sanitary and improvement
district, natural resources district, educational service unit, or
community college, as determined using the previous year's rate of levy,
-2-

LB495 LB495
2025 2025
such political subdivision's property tax request for the current year
shall be no more than its property tax request in the prior year, and the
political subdivision's rate of levy for the current year shall be
adjusted accordingly when such rate is set by the county board of
equalization pursuant to section 77-1601. The governing body of the
political subdivision shall pass a resolution or ordinance to set the
amount of its property tax request after holding the public hearing
required in subsection (3) of this section. If the governing body of a
political subdivision seeks to set its property tax request at an amount
that exceeds its property tax request in the prior year, it may do so,
subject to the limitations provided in the School District Property Tax
Limitation Act and the Property Tax Growth Limitation Act, after holding
the public hearing required in subsection (3) of this section and by
passing a resolution or ordinance that complies with subsection (4) of
this section. If any county, city, or school district , or community
college seeks to increase its property tax request by more than the
allowable growth percentage, such political subdivision shall comply with
the requirements of section 77-1633 in lieu of the requirements in
subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) The resolution or ordinance required under this section shall
only be passed after a special public hearing called for such purpose is
held and after notice is published in a newspaper of general circulation
in the area of the political subdivision at least four calendar days
prior to the hearing. For purposes of such notice, the four calendar days
shall include the day of publication but not the day of hearing. If the
political subdivision's total operating budget, not including reserves,
does not exceed ten thousand dollars per year or twenty thousand dollars
per biennial period, the notice may be posted at the governing body's
principal headquarters. The hearing notice shall contain the following
information: The certified taxable valuation under section 13-509 for the
prior year, the certified taxable valuation under section 13-509 for the
-3-

LB495 LB495
2025 2025
current year, and the percentage increase or decrease in such valuations
from the prior year to the current year; the dollar amount of the prior
year's tax request and the property tax rate that was necessary to fund
that tax request; the property tax rate that would be necessary to fund
last year's tax request if applied to the current year's valuation; the
proposed dollar amount of the tax request for the current year and the
property tax rate that will be necessary to fund that tax request; the
percentage increase or decrease in the property tax rate from the prior
year to the current year; and the percentage increase or decrease in the
total operating budget from the prior year to the current year.
(4) Any resolution or ordinance setting a political subdivision's
property tax request under this section at an amount that exceeds the
political subdivision's property tax request in the prior year shall
include, but not be limited to, the following information:
(a) The name of the political subdivision;
(b) The amount of the property tax request;
(c) The following statements:
(i) The total assessed value of property differs from last year's
total assessed value by ..... percent;
(ii) The tax rate which would levy the same amount of property taxes
as last year, when multiplied by the new total assessed value of
property, would be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
(iii) The (name of political subdivision) proposes to adopt a
property tax request that will cause its tax rate to be $..... per $100
of assessed value; and
(iv) Based on the proposed property tax request and changes in other
revenue, the total operating budget of (name of political subdivision)
will (increase or decrease) last year's budget by ..... percent; and
(d) The record vote of the governing body in passing such resolution
or ordinance.
(5) Any resolution or ordinance setting a property tax request under
-4-

LB495 LB495
2025 2025
this section shall be certified and forwarded to the county clerk on or
before October 15 of the year for which the tax request is to apply.
Sec. 2. Section 77-1633, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1633 (1) For purposes of this section, political subdivision
means any county, city, or school district , or community college.
(2) If any political subdivision seeks to increase its property tax
request by more than the allowable growth percentage, such political
subdivision may do so, subject to the limitations provided in the School
District Property Tax Limitation Act and the Property Tax Growth
Limitation Act, if the following requirements are met:
(a) A public hearing is held and notice of such hearing is provided
in compliance with subsection (3) of this section; and
(b) The governing body of such political subdivision passes a
resolution or an ordinance that complies with subsection (4) of this
section.
(3)(a) Each political subdivision within a county that seeks to
increase its property tax request by more than the allowable growth
percentage shall participate in a joint public hearing. Each such
political subdivision shall designate one representative to attend the
joint public hearing on behalf of the political subdivision. If a
political subdivision includes area in more than one county, the
political subdivision shall be deemed to be within the county in which
the political subdivision's principal headquarters are located. At such
hearing, there shall be no items on the agenda other than discussion on
each political subdivision's intent to increase its property tax request
by more than the allowable growth percentage.
(b) At least one elected official from each participating political
subdivision shall attend the joint public hearing. An elected official
may be the designated representative from a participating political
subdivision. The presence of a quorum or the participation of elected
-5-

LB495 LB495
2025 2025
officials at the joint public hearing does not constitute a meeting as
defined by section 84-1409 of the Open Meetings Act.
(c) The joint public hearing shall be held on or after September 14
and prior to September 24 and before any of the participating political
subdivisions file their adopted budget statement pursuant to section
13-508.
(d) The joint public hearing shall be held after 6 p.m. local time
on the relevant date.
(e) The joint public hearing shall be organized by the county clerk
or his or her designee. At the joint public hearing, the designated
representative of each political subdivision shall give a brief
presentation on the political subdivision's intent to increase its
property tax request by more than the allowable growth percentage and the
effect of such request on the political subdivision's budget. The
presentation shall include:
(i) The name of the political subdivision;
(ii) The amount of the property tax request; and
(iii) The following statements:
(A) The total assessed value of property differs from last year's
total assessed value by ..... percent;
(B) The tax rate which would levy the same amount of property taxes
as last year, when multiplied by the new total assessed value of
property, would be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
(C) The (name of political subdivision) proposes to adopt a property
tax request that will cause its tax rate to be $..... per $100 of
assessed value;
(D) Based on the proposed property tax request and changes in other
revenue, the total operating budget of (name of political subdivision)
will exceed last year's by ..... percent; and
(E) To obtain more information regarding the increase in the
property tax request, citizens may contact the (name of political
-6-

LB495 LB495
2025 2025
subdivision) at (telephone number and email address of political
subdivision).
(f) Any member of the public shall be allowed to speak at the joint
public hearing and shall be given a reasonable amount of time to do so.
(g) Notice of the joint public hearing shall be provided:
(i) By sending a postcard to all affected property taxpayers. The
postcard shall be sent to the name and address to which the property tax
statement is mailed;
(ii) By posting notice of the hearing on the home page of the
relevant county's website, except that this requirement shall only apply
if the county has a population of more than ten thousand inhabitants; and
(iii) By publishing notice of the hearing in a legal newspaper in or
of general circulation in the relevant county.
(h) Each political subdivision that participates in the joint public
hearing shall electronically send the information prescribed in
subdivision (3)(i) of this section to the county assessor by September 4.
The county clerk shall notify the county assessor of the date, time, and
location of the joint public hearing no later than September 4. The
county clerk shall notify each participating political subdivision of the
date, time, and location of the joint public hearing. The county assessor
shall send the information required to be included on the postcards
pursuant to subdivision (3)(i) of this section to a printing service
designated by the county board. The initial cost for printing the
postcards shall be paid from the county general fund. Such postcards
shall be mailed at least seven calendar days before the joint public
hearing. The cost of creating and mailing the postcards, including staff
time, materials, and postage, shall be charged proportionately to the
political subdivisions participating in the joint public hearing based on
the total number of parcels in each participating political subdivision.
Each participating political subdivision shall also maintain a
prominently displayed and easily accessible link on the home page of the
-7-

LB495 LB495
2025 2025
political subdivision's website to the political subdivision's proposed
budget, except that this requirement shall not apply if the political
subdivision is a county with a population of less than ten thousand
inhabitants, a city with a population of less than one thousand
inhabitants, or, for joint public hearings prior to January 1, 2024, a
school district.
(i) The postcard sent under this subsection and the notice posted on
the county's website, if required under subdivision (3)(g)(ii) of this
section, and published in the newspaper shall include the date, time, and
location for the joint public hearing, a listing of and telephone number
for each political subdivision that will be participating in the joint
public hearing, and the amount of each participating political
subdivision's property tax request. The postcard shall also contain the
following information:
(i) The following words in capitalized type at the top of the
postcard: NOTICE OF PROPOSED TAX INCREASE;
(ii) The name of the county that will hold the joint public hearing,
which shall appear directly underneath the capitalized words described in
subdivision (3)(i)(i) of this section;
(iii) The following statement: The following political subdivisions
are proposing a revenue increase which would result in an overall
increase in property taxes in (insert current tax year). THE ACTUAL TAX
ON YOUR PROPERTY MAY INCREASE OR DECREASE. This notice contains estimates
of the tax on your property as a result of this revenue increase. These
estimates are calculated on the basis of the proposed (insert current tax
year) data. The actual tax on your property may vary from these
estimates.
(iv) The parcel number for the property;
(v) The name of the property owner and the address of the property;
(vi) The property's assessed value in the previous tax year;
(vii) The amount of property taxes due in the previous tax year for
-8-

LB495 LB495
2025 2025
each participating political subdivision;
(viii) The property's assessed value for the current tax year;
(ix) The amount of property taxes due for the current tax year for
each participating political subdivision;
(x) The change in the amount of property taxes due for each
participating political subdivision from the previous tax year to the
current tax year; and
(xi) The following statement: To obtain more information regarding
the tax increase, citizens may contact the political subdivision at the
telephone number provided in this notice.
(4) After the joint public hearing required in subsection (3) of
this section, the governing body of each participating political
subdivision shall pass an ordinance or resolution to set such political
subdivision's property tax request. If the political subdivision is
increasing its property tax request over the amount from the prior year,
including any increase in excess of the allowable growth percentage, then
such ordinance or resolution shall include, but not be limited to, the
following information:
(a) The name of the political subdivision;
(b) The amount of the property tax request;
(c) The following statements:
(i) The total assessed value of property differs from last year's
total assessed value by ..... percent;
(ii) The tax rate which would levy the same amount of property taxes
as last year, when multiplied by the new total assessed value of
property, would be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
(iii) The (name of political subdivision) proposes to adopt a
property tax request that will cause its tax rate to be $..... per $100
of assessed value; and
(iv) Based on the proposed property tax request and changes in other
revenue, the total operating budget of (name of political subdivision)
-9-

LB495 LB495
2025 2025
will exceed last year's by ..... percent; and
(d) The record vote of the governing body in passing such resolution
or ordinance.
(5) Any resolution or ordinance setting a property tax request under
this section shall be certified and forwarded to the county clerk on or
before October 15 of the year for which the tax request is to apply.
(6) The county clerk, or his or her designee, shall prepare a report
which shall include:
(a) The names of the designated representatives of the political
subdivisions participating in the joint public hearing;
(b) The name and address of each individual who spoke at the joint
public hearing, unless the address requirement is waived to protect the
security of the individual, and the name of any organization represented
by each such individual;
(c) The name of each political subdivision that participated in the
joint public hearing;
(d) The real growth value and real growth percentage for each
participating political subdivision;
(e) The amount each participating political subdivision seeks to
increase its property tax request in excess of the allowable growth
percentage; and
(f) The number of individuals who signed in to attend the joint
public hearing.
Such report shall be delivered to the political subdivisions
participating in the joint public hearing within ten days after such
hearing.
Sec. 3. Original sections 77-1632 and 77-1633, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-10-